Illinois, session 104th, SB3058.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 1A-55 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/1A-55)7    (Text of Section from P.A. 100-587 and P.A. 102-1)8    Sec. 1A-55. Cybersecurity Cyber security efforts. The 9State Board of Elections shall adopt rules provide by rule, 10after at least 2 public hearings of the Board and in 11consultation with the election authorities, establishing a 12cyber navigator program Cyber Navigator Program to support the 13efforts of election authorities' efforts authorities to defend 14against cybersecurity cyber breaches and detect and recover 15from cyberattacks cyber attacks. The rules shall include the 16Board's plan to allocate any resources received in accordance 17with the federal Help America Vote Act and shall provide that 18no less than half of any such funds received under the federal 19Help America Vote Act shall be allocated to the cyber 20navigator program. The cyber navigator program shall Cyber 21Navigator Program. The Cyber Navigator Program should be 22designed to provide equal support to all election authorities, 23with some allowable modifications allowable based on need. The   SB3058- 2 -LRB104 16957 SPS 30371 b1remaining half of the federal Help America Vote Act funds 2shall be distributed as the State Board sees fit of Elections 3may determine, but no grants may be made to election 4authorities that do not participate in the cyber navigator 5program managed by the Board Cyber Navigator Program.6    In distribution of the remaining funds received under the 7federal Help America Vote Act, the Board may make such funds 8available to election authorities for the maintenance of 9secure collection sites for the return of vote by mail 10ballots. 11(Source: P.A. 102-1, eff. 4-2-21.) 12    (Text of Section from P.A. 100-623 and P.A. 102-1)13    Sec. 1A-55. Cybersecurity Cyber security efforts. The 14Board shall adopt rules, after at least 2 public hearings of 15the Board and in consultation with election authorities, 16establishing a cyber navigator program to support election 17authorities' efforts to defend against cybersecurity cyber 18breaches and detect and recover from cyberattacks cyber 19attacks. The rules shall include the Board's plan to allocate 20any resources received in accordance with the federal Help 21America Vote Act and shall provide that no less than half of 22any funds received under the federal Help America Vote Act 23shall be allocated to the cyber navigator program. The cyber 24navigator program shall be designed to provide equal support 25to all election elections authorities, with some modifications   SB3058- 3 -LRB104 16957 SPS 30371 b1allowable based on need. The remaining half of the federal 2Help America Vote Act funds shall be distributed as the Board 3sees fit, but no grants may be made to election authorities 4that do not participate in the cyber navigator program managed 5by the Board.6    In distribution of the remaining funds received under the 7federal Help America Vote Act, the Board may make such funds 8available to election authorities for the maintenance of 9secure collection sites for the return of vote by mail 10ballots. 11(Source: P.A. 102-1, eff. 4-2-21.)